02_Morphology/exercise.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>           ! Morpheme boundary
%<n%>        ! Noun
%<gen%>      ! Genitive case
%<poss%>     ! Possessive

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;

LEXICON N
%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: POSS ;

LEXICON CASE
%<gen%>:%>s # ;    ! Genitive case suffix
%<poss%>:%>'s # ;  ! Possessive suffix

LEXICON Nouns
kirk:kirk N ;           ! "church"
hoose:hoose N ;         ! "house"
car:car N ;             ! "car"
bairn:bairn N ;         ! "child"
schuil:schuil N ;       ! "school"
licht:licht N ;         ! "light"
heid:heid N ;           ! "head"
haun:haun N ;           ! "hand"
feet:feet N ;           ! "feet"
heidie:heidie N ;       ! "teacher"
heidie%<gen%>:heidie%>s ;  ! Genitive case for "teacher"
beast:beast N ;         ! "beast"
heid%<poss%>:heid%>'s ;    ! Possessive for "head"
baa:baa N ;             ! "sheep"
dug:dug N ;             ! "dog"
brither:brither N ;     ! "brother"
sister:sister N ;       ! "sister"
gless:gless N ;         ! "glass"
door:door N ;           ! "door"
waater:waater N ;       ! "water"
